Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Small Business Assistance

152.950.
Definitions. [Renumbered.]

152.952.
Division of small business assistance — Duties. [Renumbered.]

152.953.
Business Information Clearinghouse established — Duties. [Renumbered.]

152.954.
Task force on business registration and licensing. [Repealed.]

152.955.
Licensing coordinators. [Renumbered.]

152.956.
Small Business Advisory Council. [Renumbered.]

152.957.
General business license. [Renumbered.]

152.958.
Regulations — Licensing authority. [Renumbered.]

152.959.
Master application and licensure program for new grocery store operations. [Renumbered.]